Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 37 Retail Sale of Gasoline

31-37-1.
Filling station license.

Every owner shall, before continuing or commencing to transact the business of operating a filling station, obtain from the tax administrator a license for each filling station operated. Applications for the licenses shall be made to the tax administrator on forms to be obtained from the administrator and the administrator, if satisfied as to the facts stated in the application, shall issue a license for the filling station, which license shall entitle the owner to continue or commence to engage in the business within the state provided the owner shall have complied with all ordinances or other local regulations respecting the location of pumps.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 13; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-1

.

31-37-2.
Refusal, suspension, or revocation of license.

The administrator may for cause refuse any application for a license for a filling station and may for cause suspend or revoke any license issued by the administrator under the provisions of this chapter after an opportunity for a hearing of the applicant or licensee has been afforded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 13; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-2

.

31-37-3.
Filling station records.

The owner of every filling station, at the filling station, shall keep a record of the number of gallons of fuels purchased, sold, and used by the owner, from whom purchased, and the date of the purchases. These records shall be preserved for three (3) years and shall be open to the inspection of the investigators and examiners of the division of taxation upon demand.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 14; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 10; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-3

; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 10.

31-37-4.
Inspection of pumps and tanks.

The division of taxation may cause its investigators and examiners to make inspections and examinations of filling stations, pumps, measuring devices, storage tanks, and tanks on motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 16; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; P.L. 1937, ch. 2510, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-4

.

31-37-5.
Information furnished by fuel vehicle drivers — Inspection and sampling.

The operator or driver of any vehicle used for the transportation of fuels in this state shall furnish to the tax administrator or the administrator’s agents, on request, any information relative to the transportation of fuels in this state that may be required for the proper administration of the provisions of this chapter and chapter 36 of this title. For the purpose of securing the information the agents may stop on the highways of this state any vehicle which, they have reasonable cause to believe, is used for the transportation of fuels in this state. The agents may take samples of any fuels so transported or offered for sale in this state in sufficient quantity for the purpose of making an analysis of them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 16; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; P.L. 1937, ch. 2510, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-5

.

31-37-6.
Method of testing for quality of fuels.

All tests to determine the quality of gasoline shall be made by the materials section of the public works division in accordance with methods contained in “American Society for Testing and Materials Standard Specifications for Automotive Gasoline D-439-78”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 16; P.L. 1937, ch. 2510, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-6

; P.L. 1976, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 177, § 1.

31-37-7.
Weights and measures.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to give false or insufficient weight or measure in the sale of fuels or lubricating oils.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 16; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; P.L. 1937, ch. 2510, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-7

; P.L. 1976, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 43, § 1.

31-37-7.1.
Minimum standards for gasoline.

Beginning June 1, 2007, no person shall sell, deliver for sale, import, or cause to be imported into the state for sale any gasoline containing methyl tertiary-butyl ether (MTBE) or other ether oxygenates in quantities greater than one-half of one percent (0.5%) by volume. For the purpose of this section, “other ether oxygenates” shall include the following gasoline additives: Methanol; Isopropanol; n-Propanol; N-Butonal; sec-Butanol; tert-Butanol; Tert-pentalol (tert-amylalcohol); Ethyl tert-butyl ether (ETBE); Diisopropylether (DIPE); Tertiary Butyl alcohol (TBA); Iso-butanol; and Tert-amymethylether (TAME). Nothing in this section shall prohibit the transshipment of gasoline containing the oxygenates within the state for disposition outside the state, including storage coincident to the transshipment.

No person shall sell, offer for sale, deliver, or have in the person’s possession for the purpose of sale, any article or product represented as gasoline for use in internal combustion engines used in motor vehicles that does not equal the most recent version of the “American Society for Testing and Materials Standard Specification for Automotive Gasoline D-4814.”

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall be the responsibility of the director of the department of environmental management to administer and enforce this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

31-37-17

, penalties for violations of this section shall be assessed pursuant to §

23-23-14

as administered by the department of environmental management. In addition, the department is hereby authorized to administer this section according to the provisions of chapter 12.1 of title 46 in conjunction with its authority relating to underground storage tanks.

The director of the department of environmental management shall have the authority to temporarily waive a control or prohibition respecting the use of a fuel or fuel additive required under this section to avoid a disruption in the supply of fuel to the state or to other states as a result of a natural disaster or other emergency. The director shall provide, in writing, the notice of waiver; the nature of the emergency; and the time frame for which the waiver shall remain in effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 37, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 43, § 2.

31-37-8.
Peddler’s license.

Every peddler shall, before continuing or commencing to transact the business of a peddler, obtain from the division of taxation a license. Application for the license shall be made to the division of taxation on forms to be obtained from the division of taxation. The division of taxation, if satisfied as to the facts stated in the application, shall issue a license to the peddler, and it shall entitle the peddler to continue or commence to engage in the business within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 14a; P.L. 1937, ch. 2509, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 12; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-8

.

31-37-9.
Peddler’s records of purchases and sales.

Every peddler, at its principal place of business within the state of Rhode Island, shall keep a record of the number of gallons of fuels purchased, sold, and used by the peddler, from whom purchased and the date of the purchases, to whom sold and the amount and date of the sales. These records shall be preserved for three (3) years and shall be open to the inspection of the investigators and examiners of division of taxation upon demand.

Every peddler shall keep, at its principal place of business, within the state of Rhode Island, for a period of three (3) years, a complete record of the purchases and sales of fuels. This record must contain the names and addresses of those from whom the peddler has purchased the fuels, and the names and addresses of those to whom the peddler has sold the fuels.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 14a; P.L. 1937, ch. 2509, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 12; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-9

; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 11.

31-37-10.
Term of licenses — Fee.

Any license issued by the tax administrator to an owner for the operation of a retail filling station, or to a peddler of gasoline, shall, from the date of the issuance of the license, be and remain in full force and effect until or unless:

Suspended or revoked by the tax administrator;

The business with respect to which the license was issued shall change ownership; or

The owner or peddler shall cease to transact the business for which the license was issued.

In any of which cases the license shall expire and terminate, and its holder shall immediately return the license to the tax administrator. There shall be no fee for this license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2093, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3007, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-10

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 16; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 4.

31-37-11.
Prices shown on pumps.

Every retail dealer shall conspicuously display and maintain on each pump or other dispensing device from which motor fuel is sold by the dealer at least one sign and not more than two (2) signs stating the price per gallon and if the sale is by liter, the price per gallon and per liter of each and every motor fuel sold by the dealer from the pump or device. The sign or signs shall be of a size not larger than twenty-four inches (24") by forty-eight inches (48") and shall clearly and legibly state in numbers of uniform size the selling price or prices per gallon, and if the sale is by liter, the price or prices per gallon and per liter of such gasoline sold or offered for sale from the pump or other dispensing device.

The amount of governmental tax to be collected in connection with the sale of the motor fuel shall be stated on the sign or signs separately and apart from the selling price or prices.

All figures upon the signs, except fractions, shall be of the same size. Where fractions are used, the numerator and denominator of the fraction combined shall be of the same size as the whole number used on the sign, and the numerator and denominator shall be of equal size in relation to each other.

All figures or numerals on each sign shall be at least two inches (2") high and all lines or marks used in the making of the figures or numerals shall be at least one-eighth inch (18") in width, and the over-all height of any figure or numeral, except the figure one, shall not be greater than three (3) times the over-all width of the figure or numeral.

Any figure or fraction used in any price computing mechanism, constituting a part of the pump or dispensing device, shall not be considered a sign under the provisions of this chapter.

Any retail dealer operating a full-service and self-service pump, who fails to post the signs as required by this section, shall not charge more for full service than the price listed for self-service pumps.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 13; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-11

; P.L. 1982, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 37, § 1.

31-37-12.
Unauthorized signs advertising price of fuel.

No signs stating or relating to the price of motor fuel and no signs designed or calculated to cause the public to believe that they state or relate to the price of motor fuel other than the signs referred to in §

31-37-11

and required to be displayed upon pumps and other dispensing devices, shall be posted or displayed on or about the premises where motor fuel is sold at retail and within view of any public highway or reservation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 13; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-12

.

31-37-13.
Advertising statements to include taxes with price — Inclusion of all prices offered in advertisement.

Any advertisement of motor fuel by a retail dealer which states, refers to, or relates to the price of motor fuel, shall state that the per gallon price includes all taxes imposed with respect to the manufacture or sale of the motor fuel, or shall state the amount of the taxes separately and apart from the selling price or prices.

To provide for truth in advertising, any retail dealer of motor fuel who chooses to advertise the price of any grade or type of motor fuel, in addition to the mandatory requirements of §

31-37-11

, shall post in that advertisement (sign or otherwise) all of the prices of each and every grade or type of motor fuel offered by the dealer for sale. The numerals for every price offered for sale shall be equal in size and character.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 13; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-13

; P.L. 1984, ch. 282, § 1.

31-37-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 13; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-14

; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 287, § 1, effective July 21, 1992.

31-37-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-15

; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 50, § 1, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 78, § 1, effective June 12, 2010.

31-37-16.
Brand names to be displayed.

All aboveground equipment for storing or dispensing motor fuel or lubricating oil operated by a retail dealer shall bear in a conspicuous place the trademark and the name of the distributor of the product stored therein or sold or dispensed therefrom. If the motor fuel or lubricating oil stored in or sold or dispensed from the aboveground equipment by a retail dealer has no brand name or trademark, the container or dispensing equipment shall have conspicuously displayed on it the name of the distributor and the words “No brand.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-16

.

31-37-16.1.
No smoking signs to be displayed.

Every retail dealer shall display and maintain on each island upon which is located a device from which motor fuel is dispensed and sold, at least one sign containing the words “no smoking.” The sign or signs shall be of a size not smaller than six inches (6") in height by eighteen inches (18") in length.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 88, § 1.

31-37-16.2.
Air pumps.

Every retail dealer shall display and maintain a compressed air pump which shall be available during the hours the business is open whether the business is an attended or self service gas station. The division of motor vehicles of motor vehicles, safety and emission control unit, shall be responsible for the enforcement of this section and the bringing of complaints under §

31-37-17

.

The provisions of §

31-37-18

shall apply to the division of motor vehicles, and any of its agents in the enforcement of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 303, § 1.

31-37-16.3.
Additives.

Every retail dealer shall display and maintain on at least two (2) sides of each pump or other dispensing device from which motor fuel is sold at least one sign in a conspicuous place stating the maximum percent of alcohol, greater than one percent (1%) contained in the product to the nearest whole percent. In the case of methanol blends, the maximum percentage of co-solvent contained in the motor fuel must be stated separately.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 256, § 1.

31-37-17.
Penalties for violations.

Whoever, himself or herself or by his or her agent or servant, violates any provision of this chapter, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000). Upon the second finding against any licensee of a violation, whether by himself or herself or by his or her agent or servant, the director may suspend the right of the licensee to engage in the business of selling motor fuel at retail for a period not exceeding three (3) months. Upon the third or subsequent finding against any licensee of a violation, whether by himself or herself or by his or her agent or servant, the director may suspend the right for a period not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 15; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-17

; P.L. 1984, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 44, § 1.

31-37-18.
Costs on prosecution of violations.

Whenever a complaint is made by the tax administrator or by any of the administrator’s agents of any violations of the provisions of this chapter or chapter 36 of this title, the administrator shall not be required to furnish surety for costs or be liable for costs on the complaint.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-18

.

31-37-19.
Ordinances controlling location of pumps.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall affect the validity of any ordinance or other local regulation respecting the location of any pump.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 18; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 17; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-19

.

31-37-20.
Severability.

If any part of this chapter or chapter 36 of this title shall be declared unconstitutional or invalid, the unconstitutionality or invalidity shall in no way affect the validity of any other portion of it which can be given reasonable effect without the part so declared unconstitutional or invalid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 17; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 16; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-20

.

31-37-21.
Enforcement.

The tax administrator shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and chapter 36 of this title, except that the director of labor and training shall enforce the provisions of §§

31-37-11

—

31-37-17

and §§

11-18-13

—

11-18-18

. The department of labor and training shall cause any violation subject to its jurisdiction under this chapter to be referred to law enforcement officials in the city or town where the violation has or is occurring for prosecution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 71; P.L. 1936, ch. 2336, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 15; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 18; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-37-21

; P.L. 1984, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 4.